Tennessee statutes. Title 23 Attorneys-at-law
Chapter 3

Unauthorized Practice and Improper Conduct

23-3-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Law business” means the advising or counseling for valuable consideration of any person as to any secular law, the drawing or the procuring of or assisting in the drawing for valuable consideration of any paper, document or instrument affecting or relating to secular rights, the doing of any act for valuable consideration in a representative capacity, obtaining or tending to secure for any person any property or property rights whatsoever, or the soliciting of clients directly or indirectly to provide such services;

“Person” means a natural person, individual, governmental agency, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, incorporated or unincorporated association, and any other legal or commercial entity however organized; and

“Practice of law” means the appearance as an advocate in a representative capacity or the drawing of papers, pleadings or documents or the performance of any act in such capacity in connection with proceedings pending or prospective before any court, commissioner, referee or any body, board, committee or commission constituted by law or having authority to settle controversies, or the soliciting of clients directly or indirectly to provide such services.

Acts 1935, ch. 30, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9983.1 (Williams, § 7116.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-302; Acts 1996, ch. 781, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 945, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, §§62-50-101 —62-50-103.

Unauthorized practice of law, Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 8, RPC 5.5.

Law Reviews.

Beyond Borders: Can the legal system's jurisdictional structure adjust to the new economy's borderless behavior? (Barry Kolar), 38 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2002).

Professional Responsibilities of Lobbyists (William R. Bruce), 23 Mem. St. U.L. 547 (1993).

The Law: Business or Profession? (Walter P. Armstrong, Jr.), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (1987).

The Pre-Hearing Stage of Contested Cases under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (L. Harold Levinson), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 465 (1984).

The Professional Responsibility of the Law Professor: Three Neglected Questions (Monroe H. Freedman), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 275 (1986).

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

The Unauthorized Practice of Law and the Federal Bankruptcy Section 341(a) Meeting of Creditors, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 629 (1993).

Treating the UPL Epidemic (William C. Bovender), 42 Tenn B.J. 26 (2006).

Attorney General Opinions. Unauthorized practice of law, OAG 94-101 (9/9/94).

Representation of the state in criminal and juvenile proceedings in general sessions courts, OAG 00-042 (3/13/00).

A personal representative of an estate may prepare and file petitions, orders, and similar documents without the assistance of an attorney; however, because the preparation of such a form to be used before a probate court calls for the professional judgment of a lawyer and, therefore, constitutes the “practice of law,” it is not appropriate for a non-attorney member of the clerk and master's office to prepare and distribute form petitions for use by persons seeking to administer an estate without the assistance of an attorney, OAG 01-071 (5/7/01).

An act which is alleged to constitute the unauthorized practice of law may not automatically establish a violation of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, T.C.A. §47-18-101 et seq., OAG 02-078 (7/3/02).

There is no particular court which has exclusive original jurisdiction over unauthorized practice of law questions; courts generally have the inherent authority to address such questions, OAG 02-078 (7/3/02).

A non-lawyer's conduct in filling in the blanks of a form contract for the sale, financing, or leasing of tangible personal property does not constitute the unauthorized practice of law, assuming the decision concerning what information to place on the form does not require the exercise of legal training, skill, or judgment, OAG 02-078 (7/3/02).

It is not the unauthorized practice of law for a court to develop form petitions and orders and to direct non-attorney members of the clerk's office to make petitions available for use by pro se litigants seeking to have their driving privileges restored, OAG 04-071 (4/21/04).

Conduct of “public adjuster” may constitute unauthorized practice of law, OAG 05-076 (5/10/05).

A lobbyist who is not licensed as an attorney is engaged in the unauthorized practice of law only if he or she, in the course of lobbying, is rendering services that call for the professional judgment of a lawyer, OAG 05-132 (8/24/05).

Attorney General Opinion No. 05-076 does not conclude that the practice of public adjusting per se constitutes the unauthorized practice of law in Tennessee, OAG 05-133 (8/26/05).

Mediation does not involve the practice of law, OAG 06-079 (4/27/06).

Preparation of petitions for orders of protection, OAG 06-108 (7/5/06).

Whether the preparation by non-lawyers of certain real estate documents would constitute unauthorized practice depends on whether the preparation of the documents would require the professional judgment of a lawyer, OAG 07-088 (6/6/07).

Comparative Legislation. Improper conduct and unauthorized practice:

Ala. Code §34-3-1; §34-3-6 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-22-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-19-50 et seq.

Ky. S.C.R. 2 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §73-3-301 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 484.190 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 84-28 et seq.

Va. Code §§ 54.1-3904, 54.1-3905; § 54.1-3934 et seq.

Cited: State v. Mallard, 40 S.W.3d 473, 2001 Tenn. LEXIS 235 (Tenn. 2001).

23-3-102. Public officers prohibited from practicing.

Judges and chancellors are prohibited from practicing law in any of the courts of this state. A newly elected or appointed judge or chancellor can practice law only in an effort to wind up the judge or chancellor's practice, ceasing to practice as soon as reasonably possible and in no event longer than one hundred eighty (180) days after assuming office. The clerks of the several courts and their deputies are also prohibited from practicing in their own courts, or in any causes commenced, brought to or carried from their courts, or commenced in any court from which an appeal lies to their court. Sheriffs and other executive officers shall not practice law in the county for which they were elected, or in any cause, originating or pending in the courts of that county. With the exception of judges, chancellors and justices, nothing in this section or any other law shall be construed to prohibit employees of the executive and judicial branches of the government of this state who are licensed to practice law in this state from voluntarily providing pro bono legal services through an organized program of pro bono legal services that receives funding pursuant to §16-3-808 and that provides professional liability insurance for losses sustained by clients of lawyers participating in the program.

Code 1858, § 3969 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 51, § 2; 1827, ch. 63, § 1); Shan., § 5780; Code 1932, § 9973; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-301; Acts 2009, ch. 7, § 2; 2012, ch. 789, § 6.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the last sentence.

The 2012 amendment added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 7, § 4. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 7. April 23, 2012.

Cross-References. Sheriff prohibited from appearing as attorney, §8-8-205.

Law Reviews.

Illegal Practice of Law by Laymen, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 278.

23-3-103. Unlawful practice prohibited — Penalty.

No person shall engage in the practice of law or do law business, or both, as defined in § 23-3-101, unless the person has been duly licensed and while the person's license is in full force and effect, nor shall any association or corporation engage in the practice of the law or do law business, or both. However, nonresident attorneys associated with attorneys in this state in any case pending in this state who do not practice regularly in this state shall be allowed, as a matter of courtesy, to appear in the case in which they may be thus employed without procuring a license, if properly authorized in accordance with applicable rules of court, and when introduced to the court by a member in good standing of the Tennessee bar, if all the courts of the resident state of the nonresident attorney grant a similar courtesy to attorneys licensed in this state.

Any person who violates the prohibition in subsection (a) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

The attorney general and reporter may bring an action in the name of the state to restrain by temporary restraining order, temporary injunction or permanent injunction any violation of this chapter; to obtain a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, and to obtain restitution for any person who has suffered an ascertainable loss by reason of the violation of this chapter. The attorney general and reporter shall be entitled to be reimbursed for the reasonable costs and expenses of investigation and prosecution of acts under this chapter, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney fees as well as expert and other witness fees.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction:

In the county where the alleged violation took place or is about to take place;

In the county in which the defendant resides, has a principal place of business or conducts, transacts or has conducted business; or

If the defendant cannot be found in any of the locations in subdivisions (c)(2)(A) and (B), in the county in which the defendant can be found.

The courts are authorized to issue orders and injunctions to restrain, prevent and remedy violations of this chapter, and the orders and injunctions shall be issued without bond.

Any knowing violation of the terms of an injunction or order issued pursuant to this chapter shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per violation, in addition to any other appropriate relief.

Any organized bar association of a municipality, county, except any county having a metropolitan form of government, or multi-county region in which a violation occurs may bring a civil action seeking relief, as provided in this chapter, against any person that violates this chapter. Any organized statewide bar association, primarily representing plaintiff attorneys and having no locally-based affiliate associations, may bring a civil action in the municipality or county in which a violation occurs seeking relief, as provided in this chapter, against any person that violates this chapter. Upon the commencement of any action brought under this section by any bar association, the bar association shall provide a copy of the complaint or other initial pleading to the attorney general and reporter, who, in the public interest, may intervene and prosecute the action. The pleadings shall be provided to the attorney general and reporter simultaneously with the initial service to the defendant or defendants. Additionally, all subsequent filings shall be provided to the attorney general and reporter, including any judgments or notices of appeal by the initiating bar association.

Any bar association bringing suit under this section is presumed to be acting in good faith and is granted a qualified immunity for the suit and the consequences of the suit. The presumption of good faith is rebuttable upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the suit was brought for a malicious purpose.

Acts 1935, ch. 30, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 9983.2 (Williams, § 7116.2); Acts 1974, ch. 604, § 1; 1974, ch. 640, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-303; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 1996, ch. 781, §§ 3, 4; 1999, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 189, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 945, § 3; 2007, ch. 236, § 1.

Cross-References. Acts prohibited to professional bondsmen, §§40-11-307 —40-11-312.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Revocation or suspension of real estate agent's license for unauthorized practice, §62-13-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, §§ 4, 26.

Law Reviews.

Beyond Borders: Can the legal system's jurisdictional structure adjust to the new economy's borderless behavior? (Barry Kolar), 38 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2002).

Professional Responsibilities of Lobbyists (William R. Bruce), 23 Mem. St. U.L. 547 (1993).

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Unauthorized practice of law, OAG 94-101 (9/9/94).

Nonattorney agents of bonding companies organized as either corporations or LLC's may not represent those entities on petitions for surrender or exoneration in court proceedings, OAG 05-036 (3/29/05).

A nonlawyer corporate agent cannot initiate a contested case hearing by filing an initial pleading as this action would be in a “representative capacity,” would constitute the “practice of law” under this section and T.C.A. §23-3-101, and would be considered the unauthorized practice of law if any aspect of the undertaking or conduct requires the “professional judgment of a lawyer,” OAG 04-160 (11/10/04).

“Public adjuster” who engages in “law business” may be liable for treble damages. OAG 05-076 (5/10/05).

Non-attorney representing or acting as a “spokesman” for a Medicaid recipient or applicant, OAG 07-166 (12/18/07).

Interpleader actions by real estate brokers as unauthorized practice of law. OAG 14-08, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (1/14/14).

Cited: Patterson v. Professional Adjustment Service, Inc., 544 S.W.2d 617, 1976 Tenn. App. LEXIS 232 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1976); In re Burson, 909 S.W.2d 768, 1995 Tenn. LEXIS 509 (Tenn. 1995); Bivins v. Hospital Corp. of Am., 910 S.W.2d 441, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); State v. Mallard, 40 S.W.3d 473, 2001 Tenn. LEXIS 235 (Tenn. 2001); Reid v. Reid, 388 S.W.3d 292, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 554 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 9, 2012).

23-3-104. Unlawful division of fees — Penalties.

Except as provided in the Tennessee rules of professional conduct, it is unlawful for any licensed attorney in the state to divide any fees or compensation received in the practice of law or in doing law business with any person not a licensed attorney.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1935, ch. 30, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 9983.3 (Williams, § 7116.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-304; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2006, ch. 945, § 4.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Bar Proceedings — Report of Unauthorized Practice of Law Committee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 91.

Attorney General Opinions. An attorney or law firm is prohibited from splitting fees with a non-lawyer, but the full or part-time employment of a licensed real estate appraiser or registered taxpayer's agent by an attorney or law firm is not prohibited if that person is compensated on a basis other than fee splitting, OAG 02-029 (3/14/02).

Cited: Berndt v. Tennessee, 796 F.2d 879, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 27389 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1986).

Collateral References.

Attorney's obligation to share fee award with party representing public interest. 43 A.L.R.5th 793.

Attorneys splitting fees with other attorney or layman as ground for disciplinary proceeding. 6 A.L.R.3d 1446.

Partners
26.

23-3-105. Privileged communications.

No attorney, solicitor or counselor shall be permitted, in giving testimony against a client or person who consulted the attorney, solicitor or counselor professionally, to disclose any communication made to the attorney, solicitor or counselor as such by such person during the pendency of the suit, before or afterward, to the person's injury.

Code 1858, § 3973 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 3); Shan., § 5785; mod. Code 1932, § 9978; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-305.

Cross-References. Preserving confidences and secrets of client, Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 8, RPC 1.6.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Evid. 501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.74.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Privileged Communications, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 54.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501; § 501.4.

Law Reviews.

ESI Tennessee: At the Intersection of Privilege and E-Discovery (M. James Thomas), 44 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2008).

Privileged and Confidential Information (J. Houston Gordon), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 565 (1993).

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. Identification and notice requirement for access to public information under §2-10-111, OAG 98-040 (2/9/98).

Cited: Williams v. Southern R. Co., 55 Tenn. App. 81, 396 S.W.2d 98, 1965 Tenn. App. LEXIS 241 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1965); State v. Carter, 682 S.W.2d 224, 1984 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 2914 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1984); Federal Ins. Co. v. Arthur Anderson & Co., 816 S.W.2d 328, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 348 (Tenn. 1991); Kalyawongsa v. Moffett, 105 F.3d 283, 1997 FED App. 27P, 1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 1157 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1997); Culbertson v. Culbertson, 393 S.W.3d 678, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 328 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 23, 2012).

23-3-106. Testimony as to interests transferred pending action.

No attorney, solicitor or other person, under the pretext of having transferred an interest in real estate, obligations for the performance of contracts or notes for money, during the pendency of any suit at law, shall be permitted to give testimony in favor of those who held a joint interest with the attorney, solicitor or other person at the commencement of such suits, or by which the attorney, solicitor or other person would be released from any liability to perform contracts or pay money.

Code 1858, § 3974 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 3); Shan., § 5786; mod. Code 1932, § 9979; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-306.

Cross-References. Husband and wife as competent witnesses, §24-1-201.

Collateral References. Witnesses
67.

23-3-107. Penalty for improper testimony.

Any attorney offering to give testimony in any of the cases provided for in §§23-3-105 and23-3-106 shall be rejected by the court, and the attorney commits a Class C misdemeanor, for which, on conviction, the attorney shall also be stricken from the rolls, if a practicing attorney.

Code 1858, § 3975 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 66, § 3); Shan., § 5787; Code 1932, § 9980; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-307; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Evid. 501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501; § 501.4.

Law Reviews.

ESI Tennessee: At the Intersection of Privilege and E-Discovery (M. James Thomas), 44 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2008).

Privileged and Confidential Information (J. Houston Gordon), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 565 (1993).

Collateral References.

Attorney's liability for negligence in preparing or recording security document. 87 A.L.R.2d 991.

Communication with party represented by counsel as ground for disciplining attorney. 26 A.L.R.4th 102.

23-3-108. Falsely representing self as a lawyer.

It is unlawful for any person, either directly or indirectly, falsely to advertise the person as, or hold the person out as, a lawyer.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1955, ch. 259, § 1; T.C.A., § 29-312; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 27.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.194.

Collateral References. Attorney and client
11.

23-3-109. Advertised fee as basis for court award for services.

Notwithstanding any the law to the contrary, whenever an attorney advertises a fee for a legal service, the advertisement shall be prima facie evidence of the reasonableness of the fee; and no court shall award a fee in excess of the advertised amount unless the attorney proves additional compensation is reasonable under the facts and circumstances of the legal service provided.

Acts 1980, ch. 684, § 1; T.C.A., § 29-313.

23-3-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §23-3-110 (Acts 1996, ch. 930, § 1), concerning the solicitation of clients, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 112 § 3, effective May 12, 2003.

23-3-111. Delinquency in student loan repayment — Exception for medical hardship.

The supreme court is encouraged to establish guidelines to suspend, deny or revoke the license of an attorney who is delinquent or in default on a repayment or service obligation under a guaranteed student loan identified in §63-1-141(a) or when the attorney has failed to enter into a payment plan or comply with a payment plan previously approved by TSAC or a guarantee agency. The supreme court is further encouraged to establish guidelines that would not suspend, deny, or revoke the license of an attorney if the default or delinquency is the result of a medical hardship that prevented the person from working in the person's licensed field and the medical hardship significantly contributed to the default or delinquency.

Acts 1999, ch. 476, § 4; 2018, ch. 744, § 3.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 744, § 13. January 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules the act took effect April 18, 2018.

23-3-112. Action to recover damages for loss as a result of unlawful action or conduct.

Any person who suffers a loss of money or property, real, personal or mixed, or any other article, commodity or thing of value wherever situated, as a result of an action or conduct by any person that is declared to be unlawful under § 23-3-103, § 23-3-104 or § 23-3-108, may bring an action to recover an amount equal to the sum of treble any actual damages sustained by the person and treble any amount paid by the person, and may be afforded such other relief as the court considers necessary and proper.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged acts or conduct took place or is taking place, in the county in which the defendant resides, has a principal place of business, conducts, transacts or has transacted business, or, if the defendant cannot be found in any of those locations, the action may be brought in the county in which the defendant can be found.

If the court finds that the defendant knowingly or willfully engaged in unlawful acts or conduct under § 23-3-103, § 23-3-104 or § 23-3-108, the court may award treble the actual damages sustained and treble the amount paid, and may provide such other relief as it considers necessary and proper.

Any person who has been affected by an act or conduct declared to be a violation of § 23-3-103, § 23-3-104 or § 23-3-108 may accept any written reasonable offer of settlement made by the person or persons considered to have violated this chapter; provided, that the tender of acceptance of a settlement offer shall not abate any proceeding commenced by the attorney general and reporter under this chapter.

The settlement may be set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction at the request of the affected person, if the request is made within one (1) year from the date of the settlement agreement and if the court finds the settlement to be unreasonable. If the person was not represented by legal counsel at the time of the offer of settlement, the person claiming the benefit of the settlement shall have the burden of establishing that it is reasonable.

Any permanent injunction, judgment or final court order made pursuant to § 23-3-103(c)(1) that has not been complied with shall be prima facie evidence of the violation of this chapter in any action brought pursuant to this section.

Upon a finding by the court that a provision of § 23-3-103, § 23-3-104 or § 23-3-108 has been violated, the person bringing the action shall be entitled to be reimbursed for the reasonable costs and expenses of investigation and prosecution of acts under this chapter, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney fees, as well as expert and other witness fees.

This section shall not apply to an action initiated by the attorney general and reporter, any district attorney general or bar association as defined in § 23-3-103(d).

Upon the commencement of any action brought under this section, the plaintiff shall mail a copy of the complaint or other initial pleading to the attorney general and reporter, who, in the public interest, may intervene in the case. If the attorney general and reporter does not intervene, the plaintiff shall mail a copy of the judgment, order or decree to the attorney general and reporter upon the entry of any judgment, order or decree in the action.

If a party to an action under this section appeals a judgment, order or decree concluding this action, a copy of the notice of appeal shall be served by the appellant upon the attorney general and reporter, who, in the public interest, may intervene on appeal.

Any private action commenced pursuant to this section shall be brought within three (3) years from the person's discovery of the unlawful act or conduct.

Acts 2006, ch. 945, § 5.

23-3-113. Practice before administrative boards and agencies excepted.

The enforcement provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any person while practicing before state administrative boards and agencies who is authorized by statute to practice and act in a representative capacity before the state or local administrative boards and agencies.

Acts 2006, ch. 945, § 7.